Colorado, session 2026A, HB1111.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add article 10.5 to title
35 as follows:
ARTICLE 10.5
Pesticide Product Disposal and
Container Recycling Enterprise
35-10.5-101. Legislative declaration.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
(a) THE ACCUMULATION OF EXCESS OR UNWANTED PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS MAY POSE A RISK TO HUMAN HEALTH OR THE ENVIRONMENT
BECAUSE:
(I) PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINERS MAY BE COMPROMISED BY
LENGTHY OR IMPROPER STORAGE, LEADING TO AN INCREASED POTENTIAL
FOR RELEASE INTO THE ENVIRONMENT; AND
(II) THE ACCUMULATION OF EXCESS OR UNWANTED PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS MAY INCREASE THE POTENTIAL FOR IMPROPER DISPOSAL OF THOSE
PRODUCTS OR THEIR CONTAINERS WHEN SUITABLE AND SAFE DISPOSAL
OPTIONS ARE LACKING AND MAY CAUSE THOSE PRODUCTS OR THE CONTENTS
OF THEIR CONTAINERS TO SEEP INTO SOIL, LEACH INTO GROUNDWATER, OR
COME INTO CONTACT WITH HUMANS OR OTHER ORGANISMS, WHICH
INCREASES THE POTENTIAL FOR ENVIRONMENTAL CONTAMINATION OR
HUMAN HEALTH RISK; AND
(b) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A PROGRAM THAT REDUCES THE
POTENTIAL RISKS ASSOCIATED WITH THE INCORRECT OR OTHERWISE
UNLAWFUL DISPOSAL OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS AND RECYCLING OF
PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINERS SUPPORTS PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE
ENVIRONMENT.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FURTHER FINDS THAT:
(a) A COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR OR PRIVATE APPLICATOR MAY LACK
RELIABLE OPPORTUNITIES FOR THE DISPOSAL OF PESTICIDE PRODUCTS OR THE
RECYCLING OF PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINERS BECAUSE:
(I) A COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR OR PRIVATE APPLICATOR CANNOT
DISPOSE OF OR RECYCLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS IN HOUSEHOLD OR
RESIDENTIAL WASTE PROGRAMS BECAUSE THE APPLICATORS POSSESS TOO
HIGH OF A VOLUME OF EXCESS OR UNWANTED PESTICIDE PRODUCTS OR
OTHERWISE POSSESS RESTRICTED-USE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS THAT REQUIRE
SPECIAL HANDLING BEYOND WHAT A HOUSEHOLD OR RESIDENTIAL WASTE
PROGRAM CAN PROVIDE; AND
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

(II) THERE ARE A LIMITED NUMBER OF DISPOSAL FACILITIES
AVAILABLE TO COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS.
THESE FACILITIES ARE GEOGRAPHICALLY DISPERSED AND THUS
INCONVENIENT OR COST PROHIBITIVE TO ACCESS OR USE FOR COMMERCIAL
APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS THAT ARE NOT LOCATED NEAR THE
FACILITIES.
(b) THE ESTABLISHMENT OF A DISPOSAL AND RECYCLING PROGRAM
WOULD INCENTIVIZE A COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR'S OR PRIVATE
APPLICATOR'S PROPER AND TIMELY MANAGEMENT OF EXCESS OR UNWANTED
PESTICIDE PRODUCTS BY PROVIDING A PREDICTABLE, CONVENIENT,
COST-EFFECTIVE, AND LAWFUL OPPORTUNITY FOR A COMMERCIAL
APPLICATOR OR PRIVATE APPLICATOR TO DISPOSE OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS OR RECYCLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINERS; AND
(c) MANUFACTURERS OR DISTRIBUTORS OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS THAT REGISTER THEIR PRODUCTS FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION IN
THE STATE ALSO BENEFIT FROM A PESTICIDE DISPOSAL PROGRAM BECAUSE
THE PROGRAM:
(I) REDUCES A REGISTRANT'S ENVIRONMENTAL FOOTPRINT BY
PROMOTING THE SUSTAINABLE AND SAFE USE OF THAT REGISTRANT'S
ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT THROUGHOUT THE PRODUCT'S ENTIRE LIFE
CYCLE;
(II) LESSENS THE REGISTRANT'S BURDEN OF INDEPENDENTLY
MANAGING THE DISPOSAL OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS; AND
(III) ALIGNS WITH PRODUCT STEWARDSHIP AND SUSTAINABILITY
GOALS SHARED ACROSS THE PESTICIDE INDUSTRY AND SUPPORTED BY THE
REQUIREMENT IN THE "FEDERAL INSECTICIDE, FUNGICIDE, AND
RODENTICIDE ACT", 7 U.S.C. SEC. 136 ET SEQ., THAT, IN ORDER TO BE
REGISTERED AS A PESTICIDE PRODUCT, THE PRODUCT'S LABEL INCLUDE
DIRECTIONS FOR SAFE STORAGE, USE, AND DISPOSAL AND FURTHER
SUPPORTED BY THE REQUIREMENT THAT REFILLABLE AND NONREFILLABLE
PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINERS MEET SPECIFIC DESIGN AND CONSTRUCTION
STANDARDS.
(3) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT:
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

(a) TO PROMOTE PUBLIC HEALTH AND THE ENVIRONMENT AND TO
PROVIDE PROTECTION FROM THE POTENTIAL RISKS POSED BY THE IMPROPER
DISPOSAL OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS OR RECYCLING OF PESTICIDE
PRODUCT CONTAINERS, COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE
APPLICATORS THAT USE THE BUSINESS SERVICES DESCRIBED IN SECTION
35-10.5-105 (1)(a)(I) AND APPLICANTS THAT REGISTER AN ELIGIBLE
PESTICIDE PRODUCT WITH THE COMMISSIONER FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION IN
THE STATE SHOULD SUPPORT THE DEVELOPMENT AND ADMINISTRATION OF
A PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND CONTAINER RECYCLING PROGRAM
CREATED AS AN ENTERPRISE IN THE DEPARTMENT;
(b) THE ACTIVITIES OF THE ENTERPRISE SHOULD BE FUNDED BY
REVENUE GENERATED FROM:
(I) PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES PAID BY COMMERCIAL
APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS THAT USE THE BUSINESS SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 35-10.5-105 (1)(a)(I); AND
(II) PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES PAID
ANNUALLY BY APPLICANTS THAT REGISTER AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT
WITH THE COMMISSIONER FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION IN THE STATE;
(c) IT IS APPROPRIATE FOR COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE
APPLICATORS THAT DISPOSE OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS THROUGH THE
PROGRAM TO PAY THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE IMPOSED BY THE
ENTERPRISE, AS THESE APPLICATORS ARE THE DIRECT BENEFICIARIES OF THE
BUSINESS SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE ENTERPRISE;
(d) IT IS ALSO APPROPRIATE FOR APPLICANTS THAT REGISTER AN
ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT WITH THE COMMISSIONER FOR SALE OR
DISTRIBUTION IN THE STATE TO PAY THE PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT
DISPOSAL FEE IMPOSED BY THE ENTERPRISE, AS THESE APPLICANTS BENEFIT
FROM A PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES FOR THE DISPOSAL OF MANY OF THE
ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS THAT THESE APPLICANTS SELL OR DISTRIBUTE
IN THE STATE;
(e) CONSISTENT WITH THE DETERMINATION OF THE COLORADO
SUPREME COURT IN NICHOLL V. E-470 PUBLIC HIGHWAY AUTHORITY, 896
P.2d 859 (COLO. 1995), THAT THE POWER TO IMPOSE TAXES IS INCONSISTENT
WITH ENTERPRISE STATUS UNDER SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

CONSTITUTION, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY CONCLUDES THAT THE PESTICIDE
PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE AND THE PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT
DISPOSAL FEE ARE FEES, NOT TAXES, AND THE ENTERPRISE OPERATES AS A
BUSINESS BECAUSE THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE AND THE
PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE ARE:
(I) IMPOSED FOR THE SPECIFIC BUSINESS PURPOSE OF DEVELOPING
AND ADMINISTERING THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND CONTAINER
RECYCLING PROGRAM; AND
(II) COLLECTED AT A RATE THAT IS REASONABLY RELATED TO THE
OVERALL COST OF THE BUSINESS SERVICES BEING PROVIDED; AND
(f) SO LONG AS THE ENTERPRISE QUALIFIES AS AN ENTERPRISE FOR
PURPOSES OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION, THE
REVENUE FROM THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES AND THE PESTICIDE
REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES IMPOSED, COLLECTED, AND
ADMINISTERED BY THE ENTERPRISE IS NOT STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-102 (17), OR STATE REVENUES, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(c), AND DOES NOT COUNT AGAINST EITHER THE
STATE FISCAL YEAR SPENDING LIMIT IMPOSED BY SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X
OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OR THE EXCESS STATE REVENUES CAP, AS
DEFINED IN SECTION 24-77-103.6 (6)(b)(I)(G).
35-10.5-102. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS ARTICLE 10.5, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "BOARD" MEANS THE BOARD OF DIRECTORS OF THE ENTERPRISE
CREATED IN SECTION 35-10.5-104 (1)(a).
(2) "COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 35-10-103 (2).
(3) "COMMISSION" MEANS THE STATE AGRICULTURAL COMMISSION.
(4) "COMMISSIONER" MEANS THE COMMISSIONER OF AGRICULTURE.
(5) (a) "CONTAINER" MEANS A PACKAGE, CAN, BOTTLE, BAG,
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

BARREL, DRUM, TANK, OR OTHER CONTAINING DEVICE, EXCLUDING AN
APPLICATION TANK, THAT IS USED TO ENCLOSE A PESTICIDE PRODUCT.
(b) "CONTAINER" INCLUDES A CONTAINER THAT IS USED TO SELL OR
DISTRIBUTE A PESTICIDE PRODUCT AND THAT ALSO FUNCTIONS IN APPLYING
THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT, SUCH AS A SPRAY BOTTLE, AN AEROSOL CAN, AND
A CONTAINER THAT BECOMES PART OF A DIRECT INJECTION SYSTEM.
(6) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE.
(7) "ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT" MEANS ALL PESTICIDE PRODUCTS
REGISTERED IN COLORADO, EXCEPT FOR THOSE THAT HAVE BEEN IDENTIFIED
AS EXEMPT FROM THE PROGRAM BY THE BOARD PURSUANT TO SECTION
35-10.5-104 (2)(b).
(8) "ENTERPRISE" MEANS THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND
CONTAINER RECYCLING ENTERPRISE CREATED IN SECTION 35-10.5-103 (1).
(9) "FUND" MEANS THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND
CONTAINER RECYCLING ENTERPRISE CASH FUND CREATED IN SECTION
35-10.5-106 (1).
(10) (a) "PESTICIDE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
35-9-103 (11) BUT INCLUDES ONLY PESTICIDES THAT ARE REGISTERED WITH
THE UNITED STATES ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION AGENCY UNDER THE
"FEDERAL INSECTICIDE, FUNGICIDE, AND RODENTICIDE ACT", 7 U.S.C. SEC.
136 ET SEQ., OR WITH THE DEPARTMENT UNDER ARTICLE 9 OF THIS TITLE 35.
(b) "PESTICIDE" DOES NOT INCLUDE PESTICIDE RINSATE, SPILLED
MATERIAL, OR AFFECTED MEDIA.
(11) "PESTICIDE PRODUCT" MEANS A PESTICIDE IN THE PARTICULAR
FORM, INCLUDING PACKAGING, COMPOSITION, AND LABELING, IN WHICH THE
PESTICIDE IS INTENDED TO BE DISTRIBUTED OR SOLD.
(12) "PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND CONTAINER RECYCLING
PROGRAM" OR "PROGRAM" MEANS THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND
CONTAINER RECYCLING PROGRAM DESCRIBED IN SECTION 35-10.5-105 (1).
(13) "PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE" MEANS THE FEE IMPOSED
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO SECTION 35-10.5-105 (2)(a).
(14) "PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE" MEANS THE
ANNUAL FEE IMPOSED BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO SECTION
35-10.5-105 (3)(a).
(15) "PRIVATE APPLICATOR" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 35-10-103 (11.5).
35-10.5-103. Enterprise created.
(1) THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND CONTAINER RECYCLING
ENTERPRISE IS CREATED IN THE DEPARTMENT AND EXERCISES ITS POWERS
AND PERFORMS ITS DUTIES AND FUNCTIONS AS A GOVERNMENT-OWNED
BUSINESS IN THE DEPARTMENT TO EXECUTE THE BUSINESS PURPOSES SET
FORTH IN THIS SECTION. THE ENTERPRISE IS CREATED FOR THE PURPOSES OF:
(a) DEVELOPING AND ADMINISTERING THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT
DISPOSAL AND CONTAINER RECYCLING PROGRAM; AND
(b) IMPOSING THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE AND THE
PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE.
(2) THE BOARD, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE DEPARTMENT, SHALL
ADMINISTER THE ENTERPRISE IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) THE ENTERPRISE CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE FOR PURPOSES
OF SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION SO LONG AS IT
RETAINS THE AUTHORITY TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS AND RECEIVES LESS
THAN TEN PERCENT OF ITS TOTAL REVENUES IN GRANTS, AS DEFINED IN
SECTION 24-77-102 (7), FROM ALL COLORADO STATE AND LOCAL
GOVERNMENTS COMBINED. SO LONG AS IT CONSTITUTES AN ENTERPRISE, THE
ENTERPRISE IS NOT SUBJECT TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE
CONSTITUTION.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE IS AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE REVENUE BONDS FOR
THE EXPENSES OF THE ENTERPRISE, SECURED BY REVENUE OF THE
ENTERPRISE.
35-10.5-104. Board of directors created - powers and duties -
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

rules.
(1) (a) THE ENTERPRISE BOARD OF DIRECTORS IS CREATED TO
ADMINISTER THE ENTERPRISE. THE BOARD CONSISTS OF THE MEMBERS OF
THE COMMISSION.
(b) BOARD MEMBERS SERVE WITHOUT COMPENSATION AND ARE NOT
ENTITLED TO RECEIVE REIMBURSEMENT FOR TRAVEL EXPENSES INCURRED IN
THE PERFORMANCE OF THEIR OFFICIAL DUTIES.
(2) IN ADDITION TO THE PURPOSE DESCRIBED IN SUBSECTION (1)(a)
OF THIS SECTION AND ANY OTHER POWERS AND DUTIES SPECIFIED IN THIS
ARTICLE 10.5, THE BOARD HAS THE FOLLOWING POWERS AND DUTIES ON
BEHALF OF THE ENTERPRISE:
(a) TO ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR CONDUCTING THE BOARD'S AFFAIRS;
(b) TO ADOPT RULES AS NECESSARY AND NOT INCONSISTENT WITH
LAW FOR THE ADMINISTRATION AND IMPLEMENTATION OF THIS ARTICLE 10.5,
INCLUDING:
(I) IDENTIFYING THE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS THAT ARE EXEMPT FROM
THE PROGRAM BASED ON FACTORS ESTABLISHED BY THE BOARD;
(II) SETTING THE AMOUNT OF THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE;
(III) SETTING THE AMOUNT OF THE PESTICIDE REGISTRATION
PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE; AND
(IV) ANY OTHER RULES NECESSARY FOR THE ADMINISTRATION AND
IMPLEMENTATION OF THE PROGRAM;
(c) TO ENGAGE THE SERVICES OF CONTRACTORS AND CONSULTANTS,
INCLUDING THE DEPARTMENT, FOR PROFESSIONAL AND TECHNICAL
ASSISTANCE AND ADVICE AND TO SUPPLY OTHER SERVICES RELATED TO THE
CONDUCT OF THE AFFAIRS OF THE ENTERPRISE, WITHOUT REGARD TO THE
"PROCUREMENT CODE", ARTICLES 101 TO 112 OF TITLE 24; AND
(d) TO HAVE AND EXERCISE THE RIGHTS AND POWERS NECESSARY OR
INCIDENTAL TO OR IMPLIED FROM THE SPECIFIC POWERS AND DUTIES
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

GRANTED BY THIS SECTION.
(3) (a) THE ENTERPRISE MAY CONTRACT WITH THE DEPARTMENT FOR
THE PROVISION OF OFFICE SPACE AND ADMINISTRATIVE STAFF TO THE
ENTERPRISE AT A FAIR MARKET RATE.
(b) THE ENTERPRISE SHALL ENGAGE THE ATTORNEY GENERAL'S
OFFICE FOR LEGAL SERVICES.
35-10.5-105. Pesticide product disposal and container recycling
program - fees.
(1) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, THE BOARD SHALL DEVELOP
AND ADMINISTER A PROGRAM FOR THE DISPOSAL OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS AND TO COORDINATE THE RECYCLING OF PESTICIDE PRODUCT
CONTAINERS, WHICH PROGRAM MUST:
(a) PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING BUSINESS SERVICES TO COMMERCIAL
APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS IN THE STATE:
(I) ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL SERVICES TO
COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS THAT PAY THE
PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE;
(II) OUTREACH AND EDUCATION TO COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND
PRIVATE APPLICATORS ON THE PROPER AND SAFE DISPOSAL OF ELIGIBLE
PESTICIDE PRODUCTS AND RECYCLING OF THEIR CONTAINERS AND ON THE
BUSINESS SERVICES PROVIDED BY THE PROGRAM;
(III) ESTABLISHING ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL EVENTS
FOR COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS, WHICH EVENTS
MUST BE SCHEDULED AT A PREDICTABLE FREQUENCY AND IN DIVERSE
GEOGRAPHIC LOCATIONS ACROSS THE STATE, AND THE ENTERPRISE MAY
CONTRACT WITH THIRD PARTIES TO HOST, MANAGE, OR OVERSEE THE
ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL EVENTS; AND
(IV) PROVIDING A COST-EFFECTIVE MEANS FOR COMMERCIAL
APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS TO DISPOSE OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS OR RECYCLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINERS BY ALLOWING
COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE APPLICATORS THAT PARTICIPATE
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

IN THE PROGRAM TO SHARE THE COSTS OF THE DISPOSAL SERVICES; AND
(b) PROVIDE THE FOLLOWING BUSINESS SERVICES TO APPLICANTS
THAT REGISTER AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT WITH THE COMMISSIONER
FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION IN THE STATE:
(I) DECREASING COSTS BORNE BY AN APPLICANT WHEN THE
APPLICANT MUST DISPOSE OF AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT INDEPENDENT
OF A CONVENIENT, LOCAL, AND ESTABLISHED PROGRAM;
(II) SUPPORTING AN APPLICANT'S PRODUCT STEWARDSHIP GOALS BY
PROVIDING A SAFE, RELIABLE, AND CONVENIENT OPPORTUNITY FOR ELIGIBLE
PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL;
(III) DECREASING THE FINANCIAL AND ENVIRONMENTAL FOOTPRINT
OF AN APPLICANT'S PESTICIDE PRODUCT BY ENSURING PROPER DISPOSAL OF
THE ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT AT THE END-OF-LIFE STAGE; AND
(IV) DECREASING AN APPLICANT'S LIABILITY FOR CONSEQUENCES
ASSOCIATED WITH THE IMPROPER DISPOSAL OF UNWANTED OR EXCESS
ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCTS BY PROVIDING AN OPPORTUNITY FOR LAWFUL
DISPOSAL.
(2) (a) BEGINNING IN STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27, THE BOARD
SHALL IMPOSE A PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE FOR AN ELIGIBLE
PESTICIDE PRODUCT THAT IS DISPOSED OF THROUGH THE PROGRAM.
(b) ON AND AFTER JANUARY 1, 2027, A COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR OR
PRIVATE APPLICATOR THAT DISPOSES OF AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT
THROUGH THE PROGRAM SHALL PAY A PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE IN
AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE BOARD TO THE DEPARTMENT, WHICH
SHALL COLLECT THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE ON BEHALF OF THE
ENTERPRISE.
(c) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL COLLECT A PESTICIDE PRODUCT
DISPOSAL FEE FROM A COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR OR PRIVATE APPLICATOR
ONLY IF THE APPLICATOR DISPOSES OF AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT
THROUGH THE PROGRAM. NOTHING IN THIS ARTICLE 10.5 REQUIRES A
COMMERCIAL APPLICATOR OR PRIVATE APPLICATOR TO DISPOSE OF AN
ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT OR RECYCLE A PESTICIDE PRODUCT CONTAINER
PAGE 10-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

THROUGH THE PROGRAM.
(3) (a) BEGINNING IN STATE FISCAL YEAR 2026-27, THE BOARD
SHALL IMPOSE AN ANNUAL PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE
ON EACH APPLICANT THAT REGISTERS AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT WITH
THE COMMISSIONER FOR SALE OR DISTRIBUTION IN THE STATE, WHICH
PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE MUST BE NO MORE THAN
FIFTY DOLLARS PER ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT, AS ANNUALLY ADJUSTED
FOR INFLATION. INFLATION IS MEASURED BY THE ANNUAL PERCENTAGE
CHANGE IN THE UNITED STATES DEPARTMENT OF LABOR'S BUREAU OF LABOR
STATISTICS CONSUMER PRICE INDEX, OR A SUCCESSOR INDEX, FOR
DENVER-AURORA-LAKEWOOD FOR ALL ITEMS PAID FOR BY URBAN
CONSUMERS.
(b) ON AND AFTER NOVEMBER 1, 2026, AN APPLICANT THAT
REGISTERS AN ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE PRODUCT WITH THE COMMISSIONER FOR
SALE OR DISTRIBUTION IN THE STATE SHALL PAY AN ANNUAL PESTICIDE
REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE IN AN AMOUNT DETERMINED BY THE
BOARD TO THE DEPARTMENT, WHICH SHALL COLLECT THE PESTICIDE
REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE ON BEHALF OF THE ENTERPRISE.
(4) (a) THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE MONEY COLLECTED
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION TO THE FUND.
(b) MONEY COLLECTED PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION AND CREDITED
TO THE FUND PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (4)(a) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) IS COLLECTED FOR THE ENTERPRISE;
(II) IS CUSTODIAL MONEY INTENDED FOR THE ENTERPRISE AND HELD
TEMPORARILY BY THE DEPARTMENT AND THE STATE TREASURER SOLELY FOR
THE PURPOSE OF TRANSFERRING THE MONEY TO THE FUND FOR USE BY THE
ENTERPRISE; AND
(III) BASED ON THE ENTERPRISE'S STATUS AS AN ENTERPRISE, IS NOT
SUBJECT TO SECTION 20 OF ARTICLE X OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION AT ANY
TIME DURING THE MONEY'S COLLECTION, TRANSFER, AND USE.
35-10.5-106. Cash fund - creation - gifts, grants, or donations -
repeal.
PAGE 11-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

(1) THE PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL AND CONTAINER RECYCLING
ENTERPRISE CASH FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. THE FUND
CONSISTS OF:
(a) MONEY RECEIVED AS A PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE OR A
PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE PURSUANT TO SECTION
35-10.5-105;
(b) ANY MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE ISSUANCE OF REVENUE BONDS,
AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 35-10.5-103 (3)(b);
(c) ANY GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS MADE TO THE ENTERPRISE
FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION; AND
(d) ANY OTHER MONEY THAT THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY MAY
APPROPRIATE OR TRANSFER TO THE FUND.
(2) (a) SECTION 24-77-108 DOES NOT APPLY TO THE ENTERPRISE
BECAUSE THE TOTAL AMOUNT OF MONEY CREDITED OR APPROPRIATED TO
THE FUND AS PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES AND PESTICIDE
REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES DOES NOT EXCEED ONE HUNDRED
MILLION DOLLARS IN THE FIRST FIVE YEARS OF THE ENTERPRISE'S EXISTENCE.
(b) THIS SUBSECTION (2) IS REPEALED, EFFECTIVE SEPTEMBER 1,
2031.
(3) MONEY CREDITED TO THE FUND IS CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED
TO THE ENTERPRISE FOR THE PURPOSES SET FORTH IN THIS ARTICLE 10.5 AND
TO PAY THE ENTERPRISE'S REASONABLE AND NECESSARY ADMINISTRATIVE
AND OPERATING EXPENSES. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT ALL
INTEREST AND INCOME DERIVED FROM THE DEPOSIT AND INVESTMENT OF
MONEY IN THE FUND TO THE FUND.
(4) ANY UNEXPENDED AND UNENCUMBERED MONEY REMAINING IN
THE FUND AT THE END OF A STATE FISCAL YEAR REMAINS IN THE FUND AND
IS NOT CREDITED OR TRANSFERRED TO THE GENERAL FUND.
(5) THE ENTERPRISE MAY SEEK, ACCEPT, AND EXPEND GIFTS,
GRANTS, OR DONATIONS FROM PRIVATE OR PUBLIC SOURCES FOR THE
PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION. THE STATE TREASURER SHALL CREDIT THE
PAGE 12-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

GIFTS, GRANTS, OR DONATIONS TO THE FUND.
35-10.5-107. Reporting.
(1) NOTWITHSTANDING SECTION 24-1-136 (11)(a)(I), NO LATER
THAN APRIL 1, 2028, AND NO LATER THAN EACH APRIL 1 THEREAFTER, THE
ENTERPRISE SHALL REPORT TO THE AGRICULTURE, WATER, AND NATURAL
RESOURCES COMMITTEE OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES AND THE
AGRICULTURE AND NATURAL RESOURCES COMMITTEE OF THE SENATE, OR
ANY SUCCESSOR COMMITTEES, THE FOLLOWING INFORMATION FOR THE PRIOR
CALENDAR YEAR:
(a) THE AMOUNT OF PESTICIDE PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEES COLLECTED
BY THE DEPARTMENT ON BEHALF OF THE ENTERPRISE;
(b) THE AMOUNT OF PESTICIDE REGISTRATION PRODUCT DISPOSAL
FEES COLLECTED BY THE DEPARTMENT ON BEHALF OF THE ENTERPRISE;
(c) THE TOTAL REVENUE GENERATED ON BEHALF OF OR BY THE
ENTERPRISE;
(d) A DESCRIPTION OF THE LOCATIONS AND TIMES OF THE PESTICIDE
PRODUCT DISPOSAL EVENTS FOR COMMERCIAL APPLICATORS AND PRIVATE
APPLICATORS PURSUANT TO SECTION 35-10.5-105 (1)(a)(III);
(e) A SUMMARY OF THE AMOUNT AND TYPES OF ELIGIBLE PESTICIDE
PRODUCTS THAT WERE DISPOSED OF THROUGH THE BUSINESS SERVICES
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 35-10.5-105 (1)(a)(I); AND
(f) A DESCRIPTION OF THE OUTREACH AND EDUCATION ACTIVITIES
CONDUCTED BY THE ENTERPRISE PURSUANT TO SECTION 35-10.5-105
(1)(a)(II).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 35-9-107, amend (2)
as follows:
35-9-107. Pesticide registration - application - fees - expiration
- rules.
(2) Each applicant shall pay, at the time the application is submitted:
PAGE 13-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

(a) An annual application fee in an amount to be determined by the
commissioner; AND
(b) ON AND AFTER NOVEMBER 1, 2026, A PESTICIDE REGISTRATION
PRODUCT DISPOSAL FEE, AS DEFINED IN SECTION 35-10.5-102 (14).
SECTION 3. Appropriation. For the 2026-27 state fiscal year,
$19,875 is appropriated to the department of law. This appropriation is from
the legal services cash fund created in section 24-31-108 (4), C.R.S., from
revenue received from the department of agriculture that is continuously
appropriated to the department of agriculture from the pesticide product
disposal and container recycling enterprise cash fund created in section
35-10.5-106 (1), C.R.S. The appropriation to the department of law is based
on an assumption that the department of law will require an additional 0.1
FTE. To implement this act, the department of law may use this
appropriation to provide legal services for the department of agriculture.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
PAGE 14-HOUSE BILL 26-1111

preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 15-HOUSE BILL 26-1111